Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.07.090

Holders or owners of bonds—Trustees—Enforcement of rights—Purchase at foreclosure sale.

Any holder or owner of bonds of the authority issued under this chapter or any holder of the coupons appertaining to the bonds, and the trustee or trustees under any trust indenture, except to the extent the rights given are restricted by the authority in any bond resolution or trust indenture authorizing the bonds, may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus, or other proceedings, protect and enforce any of their respective rights, and may become the purchaser at any foreclosure sale if the person is the highest bidder.

[ 1983 c 169 s 9.]